Washington statutes.
RCW 35.95.010

Declaration of intent and purpose.

We, the legislature find that an increasing number of municipally owned, or leased, and operated transportation systems in the urban areas of the state of Washington, as in the nation, are finding it impossible, from the revenues derived from tolls, tariffs and fares, to maintain the financial solvency of such systems, and as a result thereof such municipalities have been forced to subsidize such systems to the detriment of other essential public services.

All persons in a community benefit from a solvent and adequate public transportation system, either directly or indirectly, and the responsibility of financing the operation, maintenance, and capital needs of such systems is a community obligation and responsibility which should be shared by all.

We further find and declare that the maintenance and operation of an adequate public transportation system is an absolute necessity and is essential to the economic, industrial and cultural growth, development and prosperity of a municipality and of the state and nation, and to protect the health and welfare of the residents of such municipalities and the public in general.

We further find and declare that the appropriation of general funds and levying and collection of taxes by such municipalities as authorized in the succeeding sections of this chapter is necessary, and any funds so derived and expended are for a public purpose for which public funds may properly be used.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 111 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 255: See notes following RCW 35.58.272.